Missouri, session 2026, HB1859.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 577, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 577.018, to read as follows:
577.018. 1. A person commits the offense of possession of an open alcoholic
beverage container in a motor vehicle if the person possesses an open container
containing an alcoholic beverage while in the passenger area of a motor vehicle that is
on any public thoroughfare, including state roads; county roads; and public streets,
avenues, boulevards, parkways, or alleys, or any public highway.
2. The offense of possession of an open alcoholic beverage container in a motor
vehicle is an infraction and shall not be reflected on any records maintained by the
department of revenue.
3. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Open alcoholic beverage container", any bottle, can, or other receptacle
that contains any amount of alcoholic beverage and:
(a) Is open or has a broken seal; or
(b) The contents of which are partially removed;
(2) "Passenger area", the area designed to seat the driver and passengers while a
motor vehicle is in operation and any area that is readily accessible to the driver or a
passenger while in his or her seating position; provided, however, such term shall not
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1859 2
include any locked glove compartment or, in a passenger car not equipped with a trunk,
any area behind the rearmost upright seat or not normally occupied by the driver or
passenger.
4. The provisions of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to any passenger
in the passenger area of a motor vehicle designed, maintained, or used primarily for the
transportation of persons for compensation or in the living quarters of a motor home or
house trailer.
5. Only a person who possesses an open alcoholic beverage container in a motor
vehicle in violation of this section shall be charged with an offense under this section;
provided, however, that an operator of a motor vehicle who is alone in the passenger
area of the motor vehicle shall be deemed to be in possession of any open alcoholic
beverage container in such passenger area.
✔